Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,229
Metropolitan utilities district license plates; public power district license plates; registration fee.

(1) This subsection applies until January 1, 2023. The registration fee for a public power district motor vehicle shall be the fee provided for commercial motor vehicles in section 60-3,147. The registration fee for a public power district trailer shall be the fee provided for a trailer in section 60-3,151.

(2) This subsection applies beginning January 1, 2023. The registration fee for a metropolitan utilities district motor vehicle or public power district motor vehicle shall be the fee provided for commercial motor vehicles in section 60-3,147. The registration fee for a metropolitan utilities district trailer or public power district trailer shall be the fee provided for a trailer in section 60-3,151.

Laws 2016, LB783, § 12;

Laws 2017, LB263, § 58;

Laws 2018, LB909, § 72.